Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
EXTENDED STAY CENTER LICENSING
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2018 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 441.015 to
441.087.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Extended stay center” means a facility that provides extended stay services.
(b) “Extended  stay services” means post-surgical and post-diagnostic medical and nursing
services provided to a patient who is recovering from a surgical procedure performed in an
ambulatory surgical center.
(c) “Local hospital” has the meaning given that term in rules adopted by  the Oregon
Health Authority that are consistent with federal requirements.
(d) “Operating room” has the meaning given that term in rules adopted by  the authority.
(2) The authority shall adopt rules and procedures for the licensing of extended stay
centers to ensure that each licensed extended stay center:
(a) Is affiliated with a facility:
(A) That is licensed by the authority as an ambulatory surgical center;
(B) Whose license is in good standing with the authority; and
(C) That meets the criteria in subsection (3) of this section;
(b) Has no more than two recovery beds for each operating  room that is in its affiliated
ambulatory surgical center and a total of no more than 10 recovery beds;
(c) Discharges patients  within 48 hours from the time of admission to the ambulatory
surgical center;
(d)(A) Has an agreement with at least one local hospital that has the capabilities  to treat
patients requiring medical care that exceeds the capabilities  of the extended stay center and
the agreement complies with  the federal requirements applicable to patient transfer agree-
ments between ambulatory surgical centers and local hospitals; or
(B) Is affiliated with an ambulatory surgical center in which all of the  physicians per-
forming surgeries have admitting privileges at a local hospital that has the capabilities to
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 1
treat patients requiring medical care that exceeds  the capabilities of the extended stay cen-
ter;
(e) Conforms to all patient safety and facility requirements adopted by the authority by
rule;
(f) Uses admission criteria based only on the extended stay center’s:
(A) Medical screening criteria;
(B) Evidence-based surgery guidelines; or
(C) Patient safety standards;
(g) Orally and in writing, clearly notifies  patients with Medicare coverage of the services
provided by the extended stay center that are not covered by Medicare;
(h) Reports data  and metrics to the authority as prescribed by the authority by rule,
including but not limited to the:
(A) Types of procedures performed  at the affiliated ambulatory surgical center for which
patients are transferred to the extended stay center for recovery;
(B) Average duration of patient stays at the extended stay center;
(C) Medical acuity of the patients served by the extended stay center;
(D) Types of payers that reimburse services provided at the extended  stay center and the
percentage of each payer type in the total number of payers; and
(E) Frequency and cause of patient  transfers from the extended stay center to a hospital;
and
(i) Is located within an urban area as defined by the Office of Rural Health.
(3) The ambulatory surgical center that is affiliated with an extended stay center must:
(a) Not be affiliated with any other licensed extended stay center;
(b) Be physically contiguous with the extended stay center;
(c) Have demonstrated safe operating procedures in an outpatient surgery setting  for no
less than 24 consecutive months;
(d) Be certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services as participating  in the
ambulatory surgical center quality reporting program  administered by the Centers for Med-
icare and Medicaid Services; and
(e) Be accredited by a national accrediting organization approved by the authority.
(4) The authority shall mitigate barriers to and  facilitate the reimbursement of extended
stay centers with medical assistance funds.
SECTION 3.
(1) The Health Evidence Review Commission established under  ORS 414.688
shall develop evidence-based guidelines regarding the patient characteristics and  surgical
procedures that may be appropriate for  ambulatory surgical centers and extended stay cen-
ters. The commission shall provide  a report of the timeline and plan for implementing the
guidelines to the Legislative Assembly during the 2019 regular session.
(2) No later  than December 31, 2022, the Oregon Health Authority shall report to the
interim committees of the Legislative  Assembly related to health on the implementation of
section 2 of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 4.  ORS 441.020 is amended to read:
441.020. (1) Licenses for health care facilities, except long term care facilities as defined in ORS
442.015, must be obtained from the Oregon Health Authority.
(2) Licenses for long term care  facilities must be obtained from the Department of Human Ser-
vices.
(3) Applications shall be upon such forms and shall contain such information as  the authority
or the department may reasonably require, which may include  affirmative evidence of ability to
comply with such reasonable standards and rules as may lawfully be  prescribed under ORS 441.025.
(4)(a) Each application submitted to the Oregon Health Authority must be accompanied by the
license fee. If the license  is denied, the fee shall be refunded to the applicant. If the license is issued,
the fee shall be paid into the State Treasury to the  credit of the Oregon Health Authority Fund for
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 2
the purpose of carrying out the functions of the Oregon Health  Authority under ORS 441.015 to
[441.063] 441.087 and 441.196; or
(b) Each application submitted to the Department  of Human Services must be accompanied by
the application fee  or the annual renewal fee, as applicable. If the license is denied, the fee shall
be refunded to  the applicant. If the license is issued, the fee shall be paid into the State Treasury
to the credit of the Department of Human Services Account for the purpose  of carrying out the
functions of the Department of Human Services under ORS 431A.050  to  431A.080, 441.015  to
[441.063] 441.087 and 441.196.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (8) of this section, for hospitals with:
(a) Fewer than 26 beds, the annual license fee shall be $1,250.
(b) Twenty-six beds or more but fewer than 50 beds, the annual license fee shall be $1,850.
(c) Fifty or more beds but fewer than 100 beds, the annual license fee shall be $3,800.
(d) One hundred beds or more but fewer than 200 beds, the annual license fee shall be $6,525.
(e) Two hundred or more beds, but fewer than 500 beds, the annual license fee shall be $8,500.
(f) Five hundred or more beds, the annual license fee shall be $12,070.
(6) A hospital shall pay an annual fee  of $750 for each hospital satellite indorsed under its li-
cense.
(7) The authority  may charge a reduced hospital fee or hospital satellite fee if the authority
determines that charging the standard fee constitutes a significant financial burden to the facility.
(8) For long term care facilities with:
(a) One to 15  beds, the application fee shall be $2,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be $1,000.
(b) Sixteen to 49 beds, the application fee  shall be $3,000 and the annual renewal fee shall be
$1,500.
(c) Fifty to 99 beds, the application fee shall be $4,000 and the annual renewal fee  shall be
$2,000.
(d) One hundred to 150 beds, the application fee shall  be $5,000 and the annual renewal fee shall
be $2,500.
(e) More than 150 beds, the application fee shall be $6,000 and  the annual renewal fee shall be
$3,000.
(9) For ambulatory surgical centers, the annual license fee shall be:
(a) $1,750 for certified and high complexity noncertified ambulatory  surgical centers with more
than two procedure rooms.
(b) $1,250 for certified  and high complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical centers with no
more than two procedure rooms.
(c) $1,000 for moderate complexity noncertified ambulatory surgical centers.
(10) For birthing centers, the annual license fee shall be $750.
(11) For outpatient renal dialysis facilities, the annual license fee shall be $2,000.
(12) The authority shall prescribe by rule the  fee for licensing an extended stay center,
not to exceed:
(a) An application fee of $25,000; and
(b) An annual renewal fee of $5,000.
[(12)] (13)  During the time the licenses remain in force, holders are not required to  pay in-
spection fees to any county, city or other municipality.
[(13)] (14) Any health care facility license may  be indorsed to permit operation at more than one
location.  If so, the applicable license fee shall be the sum of the license fees that would be applicable
if each location were separately licensed.  The authority may include hospital satellites on a
hospital’s license in accordance with rules adopted by the authority.
[(14)] (15) Licenses for health maintenance organizations shall be obtained from the Director  of
the Department of Consumer and Business Services pursuant to ORS 731.072.
[(15)] (16) Notwithstanding subsection (4) of this section,  all  moneys received for approved
applications pursuant to subsection (8) of this  section shall be deposited in the Quality Care Fund
established in ORS 443.001.
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 3
[(16)] (17) As used in this section:
(a) “Hospital satellite” has the meaning prescribed by the authority by rule.
(b) “Procedure room” means a room where surgery or invasive procedures are performed.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 442.015 is amended to read:
442.015. As used in ORS chapter 441 and this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Acquire” or “acquisition” means  obtaining equipment, supplies, components or facilities by
any means, including purchase, capital or operating lease, rental or  donation, for the purpose of
using such equipment, supplies, components  or facilities to provide health services in Oregon. When
equipment or other materials are obtained outside of this  state, acquisition is considered to occur
when the equipment or  other materials begin to be used in Oregon for the provision of health ser-
vices or when such services are offered for use in Oregon.
(2) “Affected persons” has the same meaning as given to “party” in ORS 183.310.
(3)(a) “Ambulatory surgical center” means a facility or portion of a facility  that operates ex-
clusively for the purpose of providing surgical services to patients who do not require
hospitalization and for whom the expected duration of services does not exceed 24  hours following
admission.
(b) “Ambulatory surgical center” does not mean:
(A) Individual or group practice offices of private physicians or dentists that  do not contain a
distinct area  used for outpatient surgical treatment on a regular and organized basis, or that only
provide surgery routinely provided in a physician’s or dentist’s  office using local anesthesia or
conscious sedation; or
(B) A portion of a licensed hospital designated for outpatient surgical treatment.
(4) “Delegated credentialing agreement” means a written  agreement between an originating-site
hospital and  a distant-site hospital that provides that the medical staff of the originating-site hospi-
tal will rely upon the credentialing and privileging decisions of  the distant-site hospital in making
recommendations to the governing body of the originating-site hospital as to  whether to credential
a telemedicine provider,  practicing at the distant-site hospital either as an employee or under con-
tract, to provide telemedicine services to patients in the originating-site hospital.
(5) “Develop” means to undertake those activities that on their completion will result in the
offer of a new institutional health service or the incurring  of a financial obligation, as defined under
applicable state law, in relation to the offering of such a health service.
(6) “Distant-site hospital” means the  hospital where a telemedicine provider, at the time the
telemedicine provider is providing telemedicine services, is  practicing as an employee or under
contract.
(7) “Essential long term care facility” means an individual long term care facility that  serves
predominantly rural and frontier communities, as designated by the  Office of Rural Health, and
meets other criteria established by the Department of Human Services by rule.
(8) “Expenditure” or “capital expenditure” means the actual expenditure, an obligation to an
expenditure, lease or similar  arrangement in lieu of an expenditure, and the reasonable value of a
donation or grant in lieu of an expenditure but not including any interest thereon.
(9) “Extended stay center” means a facility licensed in accordance with  section 2 of this
2018 Act.
[(9)] (10)  “Freestanding birthing  center” means a facility licensed for the primary purpose of
performing low risk deliveries.
[(10)] (11) “Governmental unit” means the state, or any county,  municipality or other political
subdivision, or any related department, division, board or other agency.
[(11)] (12) “Gross revenue” means the sum of daily hospital  service charges, ambulatory service
charges, ancillary service charges and other operating revenue. “Gross revenue” does not  include
contributions, donations, legacies or bequests made to a hospital without restriction by the donors.
[(12)(a)] (13)(a) “Health care facility” means:
(A) A hospital;
(B) A long term care facility;
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 4
(C) An ambulatory surgical center;
(D) A freestanding birthing center; [ or]
(E) An outpatient renal dialysis [ center] facility; or
(F) An extended stay center .
(b) “Health care facility” does not mean:
(A) A residential facility licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon  Health
Authority under ORS 443.415;
(B) An establishment furnishing primarily domiciliary care as described in ORS 443.205;
(C) A residential facility licensed or approved under the rules of the Department of  Corrections;
(D) Facilities established by ORS 430.335 for treatment of substance abuse disorders; or
(E) Community mental health programs or community developmental disabilities  programs es-
tablished under ORS 430.620.
[(13)] (14) “Health maintenance organization” or “HMO” means a public organization or a pri-
vate organization organized under the laws of any state that:
(a) Is a qualified HMO under section 1310 (d) of the U.S. Public Health Services Act; or
(b)(A) Provides or otherwise makes available to enrolled participants  health care services, in-
cluding at least the following basic health care services:
(i) Usual physician services;
(ii) Hospitalization;
(iii) Laboratory;
(iv) X-ray;
(v) Emergency and preventive services; and
(vi) Out-of-area coverage;
(B) Is compensated, except for copayments, for the provision of the basic  health care services
listed in subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph to enrolled participants on a predetermined periodic
rate basis; and
(C) Provides physicians’ services primarily  directly through physicians who are either employees
or partners of such  organization, or through arrangements with individual physicians or one or more
groups of physicians organized on a group practice or individual practice basis.
[(14)] (15)  “Health services”  means clinically related diagnostic, treatment or rehabilitative
services, and includes alcohol, drug or controlled substance abuse and mental  health services that
may be provided either directly or indirectly on an inpatient or ambulatory patient basis.
[(15)] (16) “Hospital” means:
(a) A facility with an  organized medical staff and a permanent building that is capable of pro-
viding 24-hour inpatient care to two or more individuals  who have an illness or injury and that
provides at least the following health services:
(A) Medical;
(B) Nursing;
(C) Laboratory;
(D) Pharmacy; and
(E) Dietary; or
(b) A special inpatient care facility as that term is defined by the authority by rule.
[(16)] (17)  “Institutional health services”  means health services provided in or through health
care facilities and [ includes] the entities in or through which such services are provided.
[(17)] (18)  “Intermediate care facility” means a facility that provides, on a regular basis,
health-related care and services to individuals who do not  require the degree of care and treatment
that a hospital  or skilled nursing facility is designed to provide, but who because of their mental
or physical condition  require care and services above the level of room and board that can be made
available to them only through institutional facilities.
[(18)(a)] (19)(a)  “Long term care  facility” means a permanent facility with inpatient beds, pro-
viding:
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 5
(A) Medical  services, including nursing services but excluding surgical procedures except as
may be permitted by the rules of the Director of Human Services; and
(B) Treatment for two or more unrelated patients.
(b) “Long term care facility” includes skilled  nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities
but does not include facilities licensed and operated pursuant to ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
[(19)] (20) “New hospital” means:
(a) A facility that  did not offer hospital services on a regular basis within its service area within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating or proposing to initiate such services; or
(b) Any replacement of an existing hospital that involves  a substantial increase or change in the
services offered.
[(20)] (21) “New skilled nursing or intermediate care service or  facility” means a service or fa-
cility that did not offer long term care services on a regular basis by  or through the facility within
the prior 12-month period and is  initiating or proposing to initiate such services. “New skilled
nursing or intermediate care service or  facility” also includes the rebuilding of a long term care
facility, the relocation of buildings that are a part of  a long term care facility, the relocation of long
term care beds from  one facility to another or an increase in the number of beds of more than 10
or 10 percent of the bed capacity, whichever is the lesser, within a two-year period  in a facility that
applied for a certificate of need between August 1,  2011, and December 1, 2012, or submitted a letter
of intent under ORS 442.315 (7) between January 15, 2013, and January 31, 2013.
[(21)] (22)  “Offer” means that the health care facility holds itself out as capable of  providing,
or as having the means for the provision of, specified health services.
[(22)] (23)  “Originating-site hospital” means a hospital in  which a patient is located while re-
ceiving telemedicine services.
[(23)] (24) “Outpatient renal dialysis  facility” means a facility that provides renal dialysis ser-
vices directly to outpatients.
[(24)] (25) “Person” means  an individual, a trust or estate, a partnership, a corporation (includ-
ing associations, joint stock companies and insurance companies), a state, or a political  subdivision
or instrumentality, including a municipal corporation, of a state.
[(25)] (26) “Skilled nursing facility” means a facility or a distinct part of a facility, that is  pri-
marily engaged in providing to inpatients skilled nursing care  and related services for patients who
require medical or nursing care, or an institution that provides rehabilitation  services for the re-
habilitation of individuals who are injured or sick or who have disabilities.
[(26)] (27) “Telemedicine” means the provision of health services to patients by physicians  and
health care practitioners from a distance using electronic communications.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 442.015, as amended by section  22, chapter 608, Oregon Laws 2013, is
amended to read:
442.015. As used in ORS chapter 441 and this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Acquire” or “acquisition” means  obtaining equipment, supplies, components or facilities by
any means, including purchase, capital or operating lease, rental or  donation, for the purpose of
using such equipment, supplies, components  or facilities to provide health services in Oregon. When
equipment or other materials are obtained outside of this  state, acquisition is considered to occur
when the equipment or  other materials begin to be used in Oregon for the provision of health ser-
vices or when such services are offered for use in Oregon.
(2) “Affected persons” has the same meaning as given to “party” in ORS 183.310.
(3)(a) “Ambulatory surgical center” means a facility or portion of a facility  that operates ex-
clusively for the purpose of providing surgical services to patients who do not require
hospitalization and for whom the expected duration of services does not exceed 24  hours following
admission.
(b) “Ambulatory surgical center” does not mean:
(A) Individual or group practice offices of private physicians or dentists that  do not contain a
distinct area  used for outpatient surgical treatment on a regular and organized basis, or that only
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 6
provide surgery routinely provided in a physician’s or dentist’s  office using local anesthesia or
conscious sedation; or
(B) A portion of a licensed hospital designated for outpatient surgical treatment.
(4) “Delegated credentialing agreement” means a written  agreement between an originating-site
hospital and  a distant-site hospital that provides that the medical staff of the originating-site hospi-
tal will rely upon the credentialing and privileging decisions of  the distant-site hospital in making
recommendations to the governing body of the originating-site hospital as to  whether to credential
a telemedicine provider,  practicing at the distant-site hospital either as an employee or under con-
tract, to provide telemedicine services to patients in the originating-site hospital.
(5) “Develop” means to undertake those activities that on their completion will result in the
offer of a new institutional health service or the incurring  of a financial obligation, as defined under
applicable state law, in relation to the offering of such a health service.
(6) “Distant-site hospital” means the  hospital where a telemedicine provider, at the time the
telemedicine provider is providing telemedicine services, is  practicing as an employee or under
contract.
(7) “Expenditure” or “capital expenditure” means the actual expenditure, an obligation to an
expenditure, lease or similar  arrangement in lieu of an expenditure, and the reasonable value of a
donation or grant in lieu of an expenditure but not including any interest thereon.
(8) “Extended stay center” means a facility licensed in accordance with  section 2 of this
2018 Act.
[(8)] (9)  “Freestanding birthing center” means a  facility licensed for the primary purpose of
performing low risk deliveries.
[(9)] (10)  “Governmental unit” means the state,  or any county, municipality or other political
subdivision, or any related department, division, board or other agency.
[(10)] (11) “Gross revenue” means the sum of daily hospital  service charges, ambulatory service
charges, ancillary service charges and other operating revenue. “Gross revenue” does not  include
contributions, donations, legacies or bequests made to a hospital without restriction by the donors.
[(11)(a)] (12)(a) “Health care facility” means:
(A) A hospital;
(B) A long term care facility;
(C) An ambulatory surgical center;
(D) A freestanding birthing center; [ or]
(E) An outpatient renal dialysis [ center] facility; or
(F) An extended stay center .
(b) “Health care facility” does not mean:
(A) A  residential facility licensed by the Department of Human Services or the Oregon Health
Authority under ORS 443.415;
(B) An establishment furnishing primarily domiciliary care as described in ORS 443.205;
(C) A residential facility licensed or approved under the rules of the Department of  Corrections;
(D) Facilities established by ORS 430.335 for treatment of substance abuse disorders; or
(E) Community mental  health programs or community developmental disabilities programs es-
tablished under ORS 430.620.
[(12)] (13) “Health maintenance organization” or “HMO” means a public organization or a pri-
vate organization organized under the laws of any state that:
(a) Is a qualified HMO under section 1310 (d) of the U.S. Public Health Services Act; or
(b)(A) Provides or otherwise makes  available to enrolled participants health care services, in-
cluding at least the following basic health care services:
(i) Usual physician services;
(ii) Hospitalization;
(iii) Laboratory;
(iv) X-ray;
(v) Emergency and preventive services; and
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 7
(vi) Out-of-area coverage;
(B) Is compensated, except for copayments, for the provision of the basic  health care services
listed in subparagraph (A) of  this paragraph to enrolled participants on a predetermined periodic
rate basis; and
(C) Provides physicians’ services primarily  directly through physicians who are either employees
or partners of such  organization, or through arrangements with individual physicians or one or more
groups of physicians organized on a group practice or individual practice basis.
[(13)] (14)  “Health services”  means clinically related diagnostic, treatment or rehabilitative
services, and includes alcohol, drug or controlled substance abuse and mental  health services that
may be provided either directly or indirectly on an inpatient or ambulatory patient basis.
[(14)] (15) “Hospital” means:
(a) A facility with an  organized medical staff and a permanent building that is capable of pro-
viding 24-hour inpatient care to two or more individuals  who have an illness or injury and that
provides at least the following health services:
(A) Medical;
(B) Nursing;
(C) Laboratory;
(D) Pharmacy; and
(E) Dietary; or
(b) A special inpatient care facility as that term is defined by the authority by rule.
[(15)] (16)  “Institutional health services”  means health services provided in or through health
care facilities and [ includes] the entities in or through which such services are provided.
[(16)] (17)  “Intermediate care facility” means a facility that provides, on a regular basis,
health-related care and services to individuals who do not  require the degree of care and treatment
that a hospital  or skilled nursing facility is designed to provide, but who because of their mental
or physical condition  require care and services above the level of room and board that can be made
available to them only through institutional facilities.
[(17)(a)] (18)(a)  “Long term care  facility” means a permanent facility with inpatient beds, pro-
viding:
(A) Medical  services, including nursing services but excluding surgical procedures except as
may be permitted by the rules of the Director of Human Services; and
(B) Treatment for two or more unrelated patients.
(b) “Long term care facility” includes skilled  nursing facilities and intermediate care facilities
but does not include facilities licensed and operated pursuant to ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
[(18)] (19) “New hospital” means:
(a) A facility that  did not offer hospital services on a regular basis within its service area within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating or proposing to initiate such services; or
(b) Any replacement of an existing hospital that involves  a substantial increase or change in the
services offered.
[(19)] (20) “New skilled nursing or intermediate  care service or facility” means a service or fa-
cility that did not offer long term care services on a regular basis by  or through the facility within
the prior 12-month period and is initiating or proposing to  initiate such services. “New skilled
nursing or intermediate care service or facility” also includes the rebuilding  of a long term care
facility, the relocation of buildings that are a part of  a long term care facility, the relocation of long
term care beds from one facility to another or an increase in the number of beds of  more than 10
or 10 percent of the bed capacity, whichever is the lesser, within a two-year period.
[(20)] (21)  “Offer” means that the health care facility holds itself out as capable of providing,
or as having the means for the provision of, specified health services.
[(21)] (22)  “Originating-site hospital” means a hospital in  which a patient is located while re-
ceiving telemedicine services.
[(22)] (23)  “Outpatient renal dialysis facility” means a facility that  provides renal dialysis ser-
vices directly to outpatients.
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 8
[(23)] (24) “Person” means an individual, a trust or estate, a partnership,  a corporation (includ-
ing associations,  joint stock companies and insurance companies), a state, or a political subdivision
or instrumentality, including a municipal corporation, of a state.
[(24)] (25) “Skilled nursing facility” means a facility or a distinct part of a facility, that is  pri-
marily engaged in providing to inpatients skilled nursing care  and related services for patients who
require medical or nursing care, or an institution that provides rehabilitation  services for the re-
habilitation of individuals who are injured or sick or who have disabilities.
[(25)] (26) “Telemedicine” means the provision of health services to patients by physicians  and
health care practitioners from a distance using electronic communications.
SECTION 7.  ORS 442.120 is amended to read:
442.120. In order to provide data essential for health planning programs:
(1) The Oregon Health Authority may request, by July 1 of each year, each  general hospital to
file with the authority ambulatory surgery and inpatient discharge abstract records covering all
patients discharged during the preceding calendar year. The ambulatory surgery and inpatient  dis-
charge abstract record for each patient  must include the following information, and may include
other information deemed necessary by the authority  for developing or evaluating statewide health
policy:
(a) Date of birth;
(b) Sex;
(c) Race and ethnicity;
(d) Primary language;
(e) Disability;
(f) Zip code;
(g) Inpatient admission date or outpatient service date;
(h) Inpatient discharge date;
(i) Type of discharge;
(j) Diagnostic related group or diagnosis;
(k) Type of procedure performed;
(L) Expected source of payment, if available;
(m) Hospital identification number; and
(n) Total hospital charges.
(2) By July 1 of  each year, the authority may request from ambulatory surgical centers licensed
under ORS 441.015 ambulatory surgery discharge abstract records covering  all patients admitted
during the preceding year. Ambulatory surgery  discharge abstract records must include information
similar to that requested from general hospitals under subsection (1) of this section.
(3) By July 1  of each year, the authority may request from extended stay centers licensed
under section 2 of this 2018 Act extended stay center discharge  abstract records covering
all patients admitted during the preceding year. Extended stay center discharge abstract
records must include information prescribed by the authority by rule.
[(3)] (4)  In lieu of abstracting and compiling the  records itself, the authority may solicit the
voluntary submission of [ such data from Oregon hospitals or other sources ] the data described in
subsections (1) to (3) of this section  to enable [ it] the authority  to  carry out its responsibilities
under this section. If such data are not available to the authority  on an annual and timely basis, the
authority may establish by rule a fee to  be charged to each hospital , ambulatory surgical center
or extended stay center .
[(4)] (5)  [ Subject to prior approval of the Oregon Health Policy Board and a report  to the Emer-
gency Board, if  the Legislative Assembly is not in session, prior to adopting the fee, and within the
budget authorized by the Legislative Assembly as the budget may be modified by the Emergency
Board,] The fee established under subsection [ (3)] (4) of this section may not exceed the cost of ab-
stracting and compiling the records.
[(5)] (6)  The authority may specify by rule  the form in which [ the] records are to be submitted.
If the  form adopted by rule requires conversion from the form regularly used by a hospital,
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 9
ambulatory surgical center or extended stay center,  reasonable  costs of such conversion shall
be paid by the authority.
[(6)] (7)  Abstract records  must include a patient identifier that allows for the statistical match-
ing of records over time to permit public studies of issues related to clinical practices,  health ser-
vice utilization and health  outcomes. Provision of such a patient identifier must not allow for
identification of the individual patient.
[(7)] (8) In addition to the records required in subsection (1) of this section, the authority may
obtain abstract records for each patient that identify specific services,  classified by International
Classification of Disease Code, for special studies on the  incidence of specific health problems or
diagnostic practices. However, nothing in this  subsection shall authorize the publication of specific
data in a form that allows identification of individual  patients or licensed health care professionals.
[(8)] (9) The authority may provide by rule for the submission of records for enrollees in a health
maintenance organization from a hospital , ambulatory surgical center or extended stay center
associated with such an organization  in a form the authority determines appropriate to the
authority’s needs for such data and the organization’s record keeping and  reporting systems for
charges and services.
PATIENT SAFETY REPORTING BY EXTENDED STAY CENTERS
SECTION 8.  ORS 442.837 is amended to read:
442.837. (1) The Oregon Patient Safety Reporting Program is created in  the Oregon Patient
Safety Commission to develop a serious  adverse event reporting system. The program shall include
but is not limited to:
(a) Reporting  by participants, in a timely manner and in the form determined by the Oregon
Patient Safety Commission Board of Directors established in ORS 442.830, of the following:
(A) Serious adverse events;
(B) Root cause analyses of serious adverse events;
(C) Action plans established to prevent similar serious adverse events; and
(D) Patient safety plans establishing procedures and protocols.
(b) Analyzing reported serious adverse  events, root cause analyses and action plans to develop
and disseminate information to improve the quality of  care with respect to patient safety. This in-
formation shall be made available to participants and shall include but is not limited to:
(A) Statistical analyses;
(B) Recommendations regarding quality improvement techniques;
(C) Recommendations regarding standard protocols; and
(D) Recommendations regarding best patient safety practices.
(c) Providing technical assistance to participants, including but not limited to  recommendations
and advice regarding methodology, communication, dissemination of information, data collection,
security and confidentiality.
(d) Auditing participant reporting to assess the level of reporting of  serious adverse events, root
cause analyses and action plans.
(e) Overseeing action plans to  assess whether participants are taking sufficient steps to prevent
the occurrence of serious adverse events.
(f) Creating  incentives to improve and reward participation, including but not limited to pro-
viding:
(A) Feedback to participants; and
(B) Rewards and recognition to participants.
(g) Distributing written reports using aggregate, deidentified data from the program  to describe
statewide serious adverse event patterns and maintaining a website to facilitate public access  to
reports, as well as a list of names of participants. The reports shall include but are not limited to:
(A) The types and frequencies of serious adverse events;
(B) Yearly serious adverse event totals and trends;
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 10
(C) Clusters of serious adverse events;
(D) Demographics of patients involved in serious adverse events,  including the frequency and
types of serious adverse events associated with language barriers or ethnicity;
(E) Systems’ factors associated with particular serious adverse events;
(F) Interventions to prevent frequent or high severity serious adverse events;
(G) Analyses of  statewide patient safety data in Oregon and comparisons of that data to national
patient safety data; and
(H) Appropriate consumer information regarding prevention of serious adverse events.
(2) Participation in the program is voluntary. The following entities are eligible to participate:
(a) Hospitals as defined in ORS 442.015;
(b) Long term care facilities as defined in ORS 442.015;
(c) Pharmacies licensed under ORS chapter 689;
(d) Ambulatory surgical centers as defined in ORS 442.015;
(e) Outpatient renal dialysis facilities as defined in ORS 442.015;
(f) Freestanding birthing centers as defined in ORS 442.015; [ and]
(g) Independent professional health care societies or associations[ .]; and
(h) Extended stay centers licensed under section 2 of this 2018 Act.
(3) Reports or other information developed and disseminated by the  program may not contain
or reveal the name of or other identifiable information with respect to a  particular participant
providing information to the commission for the purposes of ORS 442.819 to 442.851, or to any indi-
vidual identified in the report or information, and upon whose patient safety data, patient  safety
activities and reports the commission has relied in  developing and disseminating information pur-
suant to this section.
(4) After a  serious adverse event occurs, a participant must provide written notification in a
timely manner to each patient served by the participant who  is affected by the event. Notice pro-
vided under this subsection may not be construed as an admission of liability in a civil action.
(5) The commission shall collaborate  with providers of ambulatory health care to develop initi-
atives to promote patient safety in ambulatory health care.
HOSPITAL FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE POLICIES
SECTION 9.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Financial assistance policy”  means a policy that meets the requirements of section
501(r) of the Internal Revenue Code and implementing regulations.
(b) “Hospital” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(2) A hospital shall have a written financial assistance policy  that complies with the plain
language standards for consumer contracts under ORS 180.545 (1).
(3) A hospital shall:
(a) Provide a paper copy of the financial assistance policy to a patient upon request;
(b) Include on each billing statement notice of:
(A) The availability of financial assistance;
(B) The contact information for the office or department of the hospital that can provide
information about obtaining financial assistance; and
(C) The direct Internet address for the financial assistance policy; and
(c) Maintain public displays in locations in the hospital that are accessible to the public
that notify and inform patients about the financial assistance policy.  Locations that are ac-
cessible to the public include but are not limited  to the emergency department, if any, and
the areas where patient admissions are processed.
(4) No later than January 1, 2020, the Oregon Health Authority shall make available  to
hospitals and the general public a uniform application for financial assistance, created  by a
trade association representing hospitals, that may be used in any hospital in this state  to
request financial assistance.
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 11
SECTION 10.  Section 9 of this 2018 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Financial assistance policy” means a policy that meets the requirements of section 501(r)
of the Internal Revenue Code and implementing regulations.
(b) “Hospital” has the meaning given that term in ORS 442.015.
(2) A hospital shall have a written  financial assistance policy that complies with the plain lan-
guage standards for consumer contracts under ORS 180.545 (1).
(3) A hospital shall:
(a) Provide a paper copy of the financial assistance policy to a patient upon request;
(b) Include on each billing statement notice of:
(A) The availability of financial assistance;
(B) The contact information for the office or  department of the hospital that can provide infor-
mation about obtaining financial assistance; and
(C) The direct Internet address for the financial assistance policy; and
(c) Maintain public displays in locations in the hospital that are accessible to the public that
notify and inform patients about the financial assistance policy. Locations that are accessible to the
public include but are not limited  to the emergency department, if any, and the areas where patient
admissions are processed.
(4) [ No later than January 1, 2020, ] The  Oregon Health Authority shall make available to hos-
pitals and the general public a uniform application  for financial assistance, created by a trade as-
sociation representing hospitals, that may be used in any  hospital in this state to request financial
assistance.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 11.
 ORS 192.660 is amended to read:
192.660. (1)  ORS 192.610 to 192.690 do not prevent the governing body of a public body from
holding executive  session during a regular, special or emergency meeting, after the presiding officer
has identified the authorization under ORS 192.610 to 192.690 for holding the executive session.
(2) The governing body of a public body may hold an executive session:
(a) To consider the employment of a public officer, employee, staff member or individual agent.
(b) To consider the dismissal or disciplining of, or to  hear complaints or charges brought
against, a public officer,  employee, staff member or individual agent who does not request an open
hearing.
(c) To consider matters pertaining to the function of  the medical staff of a public hospital li-
censed pursuant to ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087 and  441.196 including, but not limited to, all
clinical committees, executive,  credentials, utilization review, peer review committees and all other
matters relating to medical competency in the hospital.
(d) To conduct deliberations with persons  designated by the governing body to carry on labor
negotiations.
(e) To conduct deliberations with persons designated by  the governing body to negotiate real
property transactions.
(f) To consider information or records that are exempt by law from public inspection.
(g) To consider  preliminary negotiations involving matters of trade or commerce in which the
governing body is in competition with governing bodies in other states or nations.
(h) To consult with counsel concerning the legal rights and duties of a public body  with regard
to current litigation or litigation likely to be filed.
(i) To review and evaluate the employment-related performance of the chief executive officer of
any public body, a public officer, employee or staff member who does not request an open hearing.
(j) To carry  on negotiations under ORS chapter 293 with private persons or businesses regarding
proposed acquisition, exchange or liquidation of public investments.
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 12
(k) To consider matters relating to school safety or a  plan that responds to safety threats made
toward a school.
(L) If the governing body is a health  professional regulatory board, to consider information ob-
tained as part of an investigation of licensee or applicant conduct.
(m) If the governing body is the State Landscape Architect Board, or an advisory committee  to
the board, to consider information obtained as part of an investigation of registrant or  applicant
conduct.
(n) To discuss information about review or approval of programs relating  to the security of any
of the following:
(A) A nuclear-powered thermal power plant or nuclear installation.
(B) Transportation of radioactive material derived from  or destined for a nuclear-fueled thermal
power plant or nuclear installation.
(C) Generation, storage or conveyance of:
(i) Electricity;
(ii) Gas in liquefied or gaseous form;
(iii) Hazardous substances as defined in ORS 453.005 (7)(a), (b) and (d);
(iv) Petroleum products;
(v) Sewage; or
(vi) Water.
(D) Telecommunication systems, including cellular, wireless or radio systems.
(E) Data transmissions by whatever means provided.
(3) Labor negotiations shall be conducted  in open meetings unless negotiators for both sides
request that negotiations be conducted in executive session. Labor negotiations conducted  in exec-
utive session are not subject to the notification requirements of ORS 192.640.
(4) Representatives of the news media  shall be allowed to attend executive sessions other than
those held under subsection (2)(d) of this section relating to labor negotiations or executive  session
held pursuant to ORS 332.061 (2) but the  governing body may require that specified information be
undisclosed.
(5) When a governing  body convenes an executive session under subsection (2)(h) of this section
relating to conferring with counsel  on current litigation or litigation likely to be filed, the governing
body shall bar any member of the news media from attending  the executive session if the member
of the news media is a party  to the litigation or is an employee, agent or contractor of a news media
organization that is a party to the litigation.
(6) No executive session may be held for the purpose of taking any  final action or making any
final decision.
(7) The exception granted by subsection (2)(a) of this section does not apply to:
(a) The filling of a vacancy in an elective office.
(b) The filling of a vacancy on any public committee, commission or other advisory group.
(c) The consideration of general employment policies.
(d) The employment of the chief  executive officer, other public officers, employees and staff
members of a public body unless:
(A) The public body has advertised the vacancy;
(B) The public body has adopted regular hiring procedures;
(C) In the case of an officer, the public has  had the opportunity to comment on the employment
of the officer; and
(D) In the case  of a chief executive officer, the governing body has adopted hiring standards,
criteria and policy directives in meetings open to  the public in which the public has had the op-
portunity to comment on the standards, criteria and policy directives.
(8) A governing  body may not use an executive session for purposes of evaluating a chief exec-
utive officer or other officer,  employee or staff member to conduct a general evaluation of an agency
goal, objective or operation or  any directive to personnel concerning agency goals, objectives, op-
erations or programs.
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 13
(9) Notwithstanding subsections (2) and (6) of this section and ORS 192.650:
(a) ORS 676.175 governs the public disclosure  of minutes, transcripts or recordings relating to
the substance and disposition of licensee or applicant conduct investigated by a health professional
regulatory board.
(b) ORS 671.338 governs the public disclosure of  minutes, transcripts or recordings relating to
the substance and disposition of registrant or  applicant conduct investigated by the State Landscape
Architect Board or an advisory committee to the board.
(10) Notwithstanding ORS 244.290, the Oregon Government  Ethics Commission may not adopt
rules that  establish what entities are considered representatives of the news media that are entitled
to attend executive sessions under subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 441.025 is amended to read:
441.025. (1)(a) Upon receipt of a license fee and an application to operate a  health care facility
other than a long term care facility,  the Oregon Health Authority shall review the application and
conduct an on-site inspection of  the health care facility. The authority shall issue a license if it finds
that the applicant and  health care facility comply with ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087 and 441.196
and the  rules of the authority provided that the authority does not receive within the time specified
a certificate of noncompliance issued by the State Fire Marshal, deputy, or  approved authority
pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(b) The authority shall,  following payment of the fee, annually renew each license issued under
this subsection unless:
(A) The health care facility’s license has been suspended or revoked; or
(B) The State Fire Marshal,  a deputy or an approved authority has issued a certificate of non-
compliance pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(2)(a) Upon receipt of a license fee and an application to  operate a long term care facility, the
Department of Human Services shall review the application and conduct an on-site inspection of  the
long term care facility. The department shall issue  a license if the department finds that the appli-
cant and long term care facility comply with ORS 441.015  to [ 441.063,] 441.087 and 441.196 and the
rules of the department provided that it does not receive within the time  specified a certificate of
noncompliance issued by the State Fire Marshal, deputy, or approved authority pursuant to ORS
479.215.
(b) The department shall, following an on-site inspection and payment of the  fee, annually renew
each license issued under this subsection unless:
(A) The long term care facility’s license has been suspended or revoked;
(B) The long term care facility is found not to be in substantial compliance following the on-site
inspection;  or
(C) The State Fire Marshal,  a deputy or an approved authority has issued a certificate of non-
compliance pursuant to ORS 479.215.
(3) Each license shall be issued only for the premises  and persons or governmental units named
in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable.
(4) Licenses shall  be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises as prescribed by
rule of the authority or the department.
(5) No license shall be issued or renewed for any health care  facility or health maintenance
organization that is required  to obtain a certificate of need under ORS 442.315 until a certificate
of need has been granted. An ambulatory surgical center is not subject to  the certificate of need
requirements in ORS 442.315.
(6) No license shall be issued or renewed for any skilled nursing facility  or intermediate care
facility, unless the  applicant has included in the application the name and such other information
as may be necessary to establish  the identity and financial interests of any person who has incidents
of ownership in the facility representing an interest of 10 percent or more thereof.  If the person
having such interest is a corporation, the name of any  stockholder holding stock representing an
interest in the facility of 10 percent or more shall also be included in the application.  If the person
having such interest is any other entity, the name of any member  thereof having incidents of own-
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 14
ership representing an interest of 10 percent or more in the facility shall also be  included in the
application.
(7) A license may be denied to any applicant for a license or  renewal thereof or any stockholder
of any such applicant who has incidents of ownership in the health care facility representing  an
interest of 10 percent or more thereof, or an interest of 10 percent or more of a lease agreement  for
the facility, if during the five years prior to the application the applicant or any stockholder  of the
applicant had an interest of 10 percent or more in the facility or of a lease for the facility and  has
divested that interest  after receiving from the authority or the department written notice that the
authority or the  department intends to suspend or revoke the license or to decertify the facility from
eligibility to receive payments for services provided under this section.
(8) The Department of Human Services may not issue or renew a license for  a long term care
facility, unless the applicant has included in the application  the identity of any person who has in-
cident of ownership in the long term care facility who also  has a financial interest in any pharmacy,
as defined in ORS 689.005.
(9) The authority shall adopt rules for each type of health care facility, except long term  care
facilities, to carry out the purposes of ORS 441.015 to 441.087 including, but not limited to:
(a) Establishing classifications and descriptions for the different types of health care  facilities
that are licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.087; and
(b) Standards for patient care and safety, adequate  professional staff organizations, training of
staff for whom no other  state regulation exists, suitable delineation of professional privileges and
adequate staff analyses of clinical records.
(10) The department  shall adopt rules for each type of long term care facility to carry out the
purposes of ORS 441.015 to 441.087 including, but not limited to:
(a) Establishing classifications and  descriptions for the different types of long term care facili-
ties that are licensed under ORS 441.015 to 441.087; and
(b) Standards for patient care and safety, adequate  professional staff organizations, training of
staff for whom no other  state regulation exists, suitable delineation of professional privileges and
adequate staff analyses of clinical records.
(11) The authority or department may not adopt a rule requiring a health care facility to serve
a specific food as long as the necessary nutritional  food elements are present in the food that is
served.
(12) A health care facility licensed by the authority or department may not:
(a) Offer or provide services  beyond the scope of the license classification assigned by the au-
thority or department; or
(b) Assume a descriptive title or represent itself under a descriptive title  other than the classi-
fication assigned by the authority or department.
(13) A health care facility  must reapply for licensure to change the classification assigned or the
type of license issued by the authority or department.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 441.030 is amended to read:
441.030. (1) The Oregon Health Authority or the Department of Human  Services may assess a
civil penalty and, pursuant to ORS 479.215, shall deny, suspend or revoke a  license, in any case
where the State Fire Marshal, or the representative of the State Fire Marshal,  certifies that there
is a failure to comply with all applicable laws, lawful ordinances and rules relating to  safety from
fire.
(2) The authority may:
(a) Assess a civil penalty or deny, suspend or revoke a license of a health care facility other
than a long term care facility in any case where it finds  that there has been a substantial failure
to comply with ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087 and 441.196 or  the rules or minimum standards
adopted under ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087 and 441.196.
(b) Assess a civil penalty or suspend or revoke  a license issued under ORS 441.025 for failure
to comply  with an authority order arising from a health care facility’s substantial lack of compliance
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 15
with the provisions of ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087, 441.152 to 441.177 or 441.196 or  the rules
adopted under ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087, 441.152 to 441.177 or 441.196.
(c) Suspend or revoke a license issued under ORS 441.025 for failure to  pay a civil penalty im-
posed under ORS 441.175.
(3) The department may:
(a) Assess a  civil penalty or deny, suspend or revoke a long term care facility’s license in any
case where it finds that there has been  a substantial failure to comply with ORS 441.015 to
[441.063,] 441.087 or  441.196 or the rules or minimum standards adopted under ORS 441.015 to
[441.063,] 441.087 or 441.196.
(b) Assess a civil penalty or suspend or revoke a long term care  facility’s license issued under
ORS 441.025 for  failure to comply with a department order arising from a long term care facility’s
substantial lack of compliance with the provisions of ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063, 441.084,] 441.087 or
441.196 or the rules adopted under ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063, 441.084,] 441.087 or 441.196.
(c) Suspend or revoke a license  issued under ORS 441.025 for failure to pay a civil penalty im-
posed under ORS 441.710.
(d) Order a long term care facility licensed under ORS 441.025 to restrict the admission of pa-
tients when the department finds an immediate threat to  patient health and safety arising from
failure of the long term  care facility to be in compliance with ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063, 441.084,]
441.087 or 441.196 and the rules adopted  under ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063, 441.084,] 441.087 or 441.196.
(4) Any long term care facility  that has been ordered to restrict the admission of patients pur-
suant to subsection (3)(d) of this section shall post a  notice of the restriction, provided by the de-
partment, on all doors providing ingress to and egress from the facility, for the duration of the
restriction.
SECTION 14.
 ORS 441.065 is amended to read:
441.065. (1) ORS 441.015 to [ 441.063] 441.087 and 441.196 or the rules  adopted pursuant thereto
do not authorize  the supervision, regulation or control of the remedial care or treatment of residents
or patients in any home or institution that is described under subsection (2)  of this section and is
conducted for those who rely upon treatment solely by prayer or spiritual means, except as  to the
sanitary and  safe conditions of the premises, cleanliness of operation and its physical equipment.
This section does not exempt such a home or institution from the  licensing requirements of ORS
441.015 to  441.087, 441.525 to 441.595, 441.815, 441.820, 441.990, 442.342[ ,] and 442.344 [ and 442.400
to 442.463].
(2) To qualify under subsection (1) of this section, a home or institution must:
(a) Be owned by an entity that is registered with  the Secretary of State as a nonprofit corpo-
ration and that does not own, hold a financial interest in, control or operate any facility, wherever
located, of a type providing medical health care and services; and
(b) Provide 24 hour a day availability of nonmedical care and services.
(3) As used in this section:
(a) “Medical health care and  services” means medical screening, examination, diagnosis,
prognosis, treatment and drug administration. “Medical health care and services” does not  include
counseling or the provision of social services or dietary services.
(b) “Nonmedical care and  services” means assistance or services, other than medical health care
and services, provided by attendants for the physical, mental, emotional  or spiritual comfort and
well being of residents or patients.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 441.077 is amended to read:
441.077. (1) If the governing body of a health care  facility or health maintenance organization
excludes or expels a person licensed under  ORS chapter 677 from staff membership, or limits in any
way the professional privilege of the person in the health  care facility or health maintenance or-
ganization solely because of the school of medicine to which the  person belongs, the license of the
health care facility shall be  subject to revocation in the manner provided in ORS [ 441.015 to
441.065] 441.030. A health maintenance organization which violates this section shall be subject to
penalties provided in ORS 731.988 and 731.992.
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 16
(2) Nothing in  this section is intended to limit the authority of the governing body of a health
care facility or health maintenance organization with respect to a  person who has violated the
reasonable rules and regulations of the  health care facility or health maintenance organization or
who has violated the provisions of ORS chapter 677 if the governing body  has reported the violation
of ORS chapter 677 to the Oregon Medical Board in writing.
SECTION 16.  ORS 442.700 is amended to read:
442.700. As used in ORS 442.700 to 442.760:
(1) “Board of governors” means the governors of a cooperative  program as described in ORS
442.720.
(2) “Cooperative program” means a program among two or more health  care providers for the
purpose of providing heart and kidney transplant services including,  but not limited to, the sharing,
allocation  and  referral of physicians, patients, personnel, instructional programs, support services,
facilities, medical, diagnostic, laboratory or therapeutic services,  equipment, devices or supplies, and
other services traditionally offered by health care providers.
(3) “Health care provider” means a hospital,  physician or entity, a significant part of whose
activities consist of providing hospital or physician services in this state. For purposes of the im-
munities provided by ORS 442.700 to 442.760 and 646.740, “health care provider” includes  any offi-
cer, director, trustee, employee, or agent of,  or any entity under common ownership and control
with, a health care provider.
(4) “Hospital” means a hospital, a long term care facility or an ambulatory surgical center,  as
those terms are defined in ORS 442.015, that is  licensed under ORS 441.015 to [ 441.089] 441.087.
“Hospital” includes community health programs established under ORS 430.610 to 430.695.
(5) “Order” means a  decision issued by the Director of the Oregon Health Authority under ORS
442.710 either approving or denying an application  for a cooperative program and includes modifi-
cations of an original order under ORS 442.730 (3)(b) and ORS 442.740 (1) and (4).
(6) “Party to  a cooperative program agreement” or “party” means an entity that enters into the
principal agreement to establish a cooperative program and applies  for approval under ORS 442.700
to 442.760 and 646.740 and any other entity that, with the approval of the director,  becomes a
member of a cooperative program.
(7) “Physician” means a physician licensed under ORS chapter 677.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 677.515 is amended to read:
677.515. (1) A physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.512 may  provide any medical service,
including prescribing and administering controlled substances in Schedules II through V under  the
federal Controlled Substances Act:
(a) That is delegated by the physician  assistant’s supervising physician or supervising physician
organization;
(b) That is within the scope of practice of the physician assistant;
(c) That is within the  scope of practice of the supervising physician or supervising physician
organization;
(d) That is provided under the supervision of  the supervising physician or supervising physician
organization;
(e) That is generally described in and in compliance with the practice agreement; and
(f) For which  the physician assistant has obtained informed consent as provided in ORS 677.097,
if informed consent is required.
(2) This chapter does not prohibit a student enrolled  in a program for educating physician as-
sistants approved by  the board from rendering medical services if the services are rendered in the
course of the program.
(3) The degree of independent judgment that a physician assistant may exercise  shall be deter-
mined by the supervising physician, or supervising physician organization, and the physician  assist-
ant in accordance with the practice agreement.
(4) A  supervising physician, upon the approval of the board and in accordance with the rules
established by the board, may delegate to the physician assistant the authority  to administer and
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 17
prescribe medications pursuant to this  section and ORS 677.535. The board may not limit the privi-
lege of  administering, dispensing and prescribing to population groups federally designated as
underserved, or to geographic areas of the  state that are federally designated health professional
shortage areas, federally designated medically underserved areas or areas  designated as medically
disadvantaged and in need of primary health care providers by the  Director of the Oregon Health
Authority or the Office of Rural Health. All  prescriptions written pursuant to this subsection must
bear the name, office address and telephone number of the supervising physician.
(5) This chapter does not require or prohibit a physician assistant from practicing in  a hospital
licensed pursuant to ORS 441.015 to [ 441.089] 441.087.
(6) Prescriptions for medications  prescribed by a physician assistant in accordance with this
section and ORS 475.005, 677.010, 677.500, 677.510  and 677.535 and dispensed by a licensed
pharmacist may be filled by the pharmacist according to the terms of the prescription, and the filling
of such a prescription  does not constitute evidence of negligence on the part of the pharmacist if
the prescription was dispensed within the reasonable and prudent practice of pharmacy.
IMPLEMENTATION
SECTION 18. The Oregon Health Authority shall adopt all rules necessary  to carry out
section 2 of this 2018 Act no later than 180 days after the effective date of this 2018 Act.
SECTION 19. (1) No later than January 1, 2019, the  Oregon Health Authority shall apply
to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for approval of a  demonstration project
or other authorization to permit the state to receive federal  financial participation in the
costs of extended stay services  and to permit extended stay centers and ambulatory surgical
centers to operate under a single license.
(2) The  authority shall report to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly re-
lated to health no later than July 1, 2019, on the status of the application described in sub-
section (1) of this section.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 441.086 is added to and made a part of ORS 441.015 to 441.087.
SECTION 21. (1) Sections 2 and 9 of  this 2018 Act and the amendments to ORS 441.020,
442.015, 442.120 and 442.837 by sections 4 to 8 of this 2018 Act  become operative on January
1, 2019.
(2) The amendments to section 9  of this 2018 Act by section 10 of this 2018 Act become
operative on January 2, 2020.
SECTION 22. Section 3 of this 2018 Act is repealed on January 2, 2023.
FINANCE
SECTION 23. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund  appro-
priation made to the Oregon Health  Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 545, Oregon Laws
2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019,  for programs, is increased by $245,991 for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections 2 and 3 of this 2018 Act.
(2) Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on expenditures
established by section  2 (1), chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, recreational marijuana  tax receipts,
provider taxes, Medicare receipts and federal funds for indirect cost  recovery, Supplemental
Security Income recoveries, Women, Infants and Children  Program food rebates, the Coor-
dinated School Health Program, the Edward Byrne Memorial State and Local  Law Enforce-
ment Assistance Grant  Program and emergency preparedness and response services, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter 545, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected  or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for programs, is increased
by $106,583 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of sections  2 and 3 of this 2018 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 18
(3) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  2 (3), chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, recreational marijuana tax receipts,
provider taxes, Medicare  receipts and federal funds for indirect cost recovery, Supplemental
Security Income recoveries, Women, Infants and  Children Program food rebates, the Coor-
dinated School Health  Program, the Edward Byrne Memorial State and Local Law Enforce-
ment Assistance Grant Program and emergency preparedness and response  services, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 545, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for shared administrative
services, is increased by $100,045 for the purpose of carrying  out the provisions of sections
2 and 3 of this 2018 Act.
(4) Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on expenditures
established by section  4 (1), chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30,
2019, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds, excluding federal
funds described in section 2, chapter 545, Oregon Laws 2017, collected  or received by the
Oregon Health Authority, for programs, is increased by $45,946  for the purpose of carrying
out the provisions of sections 2 and 3 of this 2018 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 24. The unit captions  used in this 2018 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2018 Act.
EMERGENCY CLAUSE
SECTION 25. This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 19
Passed by House March 1, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4020 (HB 4020-B) Page 20